Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1204
Imposition of penalty for violation of rule; requirements.

No collegiate athletic association shall impose a penalty on any college or university for violation of such association's rule or legislation in violation of the due process requirements of the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 4.